en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Lingerie > Women's Underpants: Bikinis; Bloomers; Boyshorts; Briefs; Cheeky Panties; G-Strings; Hipsters; Period Underwear; Thongs
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Lingerie > Roupas de baixo femininas: Biquínis; Calcinhas bloomer; Calções masculinos; Cuecas; Calcinhas semi-fio; Fio dental; Calcinhas hipster; Roupas íntimas menstruais; Tangas
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Spodná bielizeň > Dámske spodky: Bikini; Bloomerky; Šortkové nohavičky; Slipy; Nohavičky cheeky; Tango nohavičky; Hipster nohavičky; Menštruačné nohavičky; Tangá
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 란제리 > 여성용 속옷 바지: 비키니; 블루머; 남아 반바지; 브리프; 치키 팬티; G스트링; 힙스터; 생리용 속옷; 끈 팬티
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Εσώρουχα > Γυναικεία σλιπ: Μπικίνι; Εσώρουχα bloomers; Αγορίστικα σορτσάκια; Γυναικεία Briefs; Εσώρουχα cheeky; G-Strings; Εσώρουχα hipster; Εσώρουχα περιόδου; Στρινγκ
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Lencería > Calzones para mujeres: Bikinis; Bombachos; Panty moldeador; Calzoncillos; Panties cheeky; Tanguita; Hipsters; Ropa interior para menstruación; Tangas
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Дамско бельо > Дамски долни гащи: Бикини; Ретро дамско бельо тип панталонки; „Момчешки“ шорти; Слипове; Изрязани бикини; Стрингове; Полубоксерки; Менструално бельо; Прашки
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Dessous > Unterhosen für Damen: Bikinis; Bloomers; Boyshorts; Slips; Cheeky-Slips; G-Strings; Hipster; Periodenunterwäsche; Tangas
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Lingerie > Mutande da donna: Bikini; Mutandoni; Pantaloncini; Slip; Slip brasiliani; Perizomi; Slip a vita bassa; Intimo mestruale; Tanga
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Spodnje perilo > Ženske spodnje hlače: Bikinke; Ohlapne hlačke; Daljše ženske spodnjice; Spodnje hlačke; Igrive hlačke; Hlačke G string; Hipster hlačke; Menstrualno spodnje perilo; Tange
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Fehérneműk > Női alsónadrágok: Bikinik; Bugyogók; Fiú-rövidnadrágok; Alsónadrágok; Brazil bugyik; G-Stringek; Csípőbugyik; Menstruációs fehérnemű; Tangák
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 女用貼身衣物 > 女用內衣褲: 比基尼; 燈籠短褲; 女性四角褲; 三角褲; 半包臀內褲; G 弦褲; 低腰平口內褲; 生理褲; 丁字褲
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 女式内衣 > 女士内裤: 比基尼; 灯笼内裤; 平脚女内裤; 三角裤; 半包臀内裤; G 弦裤; 低腰内裤; 经期内裤; 丁字裤
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > ランジェリー > 女性用アンダーパンツ: ビキニ; ブルマー; ボーイレッグ; ブリーフ; チーキーショーツ; Gストリング; ヒップスター; 生理用下着; Tバック
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Lingerie > Sous-vêtements pour femme: Bikinis; Bloomers; Boyshorts; Slips; Culottes échancrées; G-Strings; Hipsters; Sous-vêtements menstruels; Strings
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Lingerie > Underbukser til kvinder: Bikinier; Bloomers; Boyshorts; Trusser; Cheeky-trusser; G-strenge; Hipsters; Menstruationsundertøj; G-strenge
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Lenjerie > Lenjerie intimă pentru femei: Bikini; Chiloți bufanți; Pantaloni scurți; Chiloți; Chiloți cu talie joasă; Chiloți G-string; Chiloți hipster; Lenjerie pentru ciclul menstrual; Chiloți tanga
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Đồ lót phụ nữ > Quần lót dành cho nữ: Bikini; Quần lót phồng; Quần lót Boyshort; Quần sịp; Quần lót khoét hông; Quần lót chữ G; Quần lót cạp trễ; Quần lót nguyệt san; Quần lọt khe
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Underkläder > Underkläder för kvinnor: Bikinis; Pufftrosor; Pojkshorts; Herrunderbyxor; Cheeky-trosor; Stringtrosor med smala band; Hipstertrosor; Menstruationstrosor; Stringtrosor
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Lingerie > Cuecas de senhora: Biquínis; Cuecas fofas; Boyshorts; Cueca; Cuecas cavadas; Cuecas de fio dental; Cuecas hipster; Cuecas menstruais; Tangas
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Lingerie > Damesonderbroeken: Bikini's; Bloomers; Jongensshorts; Slips; Cheeky slips; G-strings; Hipsters; Menstruatieondergoed; Strings
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Žensko donje rublje > Donji dijelovi donjeg rublja za žene: Bikiniji; Bloomer hlače; Bokserice za žene; Gaćice; Drske gaćice; G-string gaćice; Hipster gaćice; Donje rublje za menstruaciju; Tange
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Dameundertøy > Underbukser for kvinner: Bikinier; Bloomers; Boyshorts; Underbukser; Cheeky-truser; G-strenger; Hipstere; Mensundertøy; Tanga
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Bielizny > Majtki damskie: Bikini; Bloomersy; Spodenki chłopięce; Majtki; Majtki typu cheeky; Stringi typu g; Hipstery; Majtki menstruacyjne; Stringi
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > ชุดชั้นใน > กางเกงชั้นในสำหรับผู้หญิง: บิกินี่; กางเกงบลูมเมอร์; กางเกงขาสั้นเด็กผู้ชาย; กางเกงชั้นใน; กางเกงในทรงชีกกี้; จีสตริง; กางเกงในทรงฮิปสเตอร์; กางเกงในอนามัย; กางเกงชั้นในแบบธอง
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Dámské prádlo > Dámské spodky: Bikiny; Volné kalhotky; Chlapecké šortky; Slipy; Kalhotky cheeky; G-string tanga; Bokové kalhotky; Menstruační prádlo; Tanga
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Kadın İç Çamaşırları > Kadın Külotları: Bikiniler; Büzgülü külotlar; Boyshort külot; Külot; Cheeky külotlar; G-String'ler; Hipster külotlar; Regl İç Giyimi; Tangalar
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Женское белье > Женские трусы: Бикини; Блумерсы; Шортики; Брифы; Трусы-чики; Стринги; Трусы-хипстеры; Менструальные трусы; Тонг
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Apatinis trikotažas > Moteriškos kelnaitės: Bikiniai; Plačios apatinės kelnaitės; Pailgintos kelnaitės; Trumpikės; „Cheeky“ tipo kelnaitės; Siaurikės; Pailgintos kelnaitės; Apatiniai mėnesinių laikotarpiui; Kelnaitės su juostele
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Alusasut > Naisten alushousut: Bikinit; Mamelukit; Shortsityyppiset; Lyhyet alushousut; Cheeky-pikkuhousut; G-stringit; Hipsterit; Kuukautisalushousut; Thongit